Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3307
No interest for nonpayment of taxes.

In any case where it is determined by the board that the decedent died domiciled in this state, no interest otherwise imposed by sections 77-2010 and 77-2102, for nonpayment of death taxes between the date of the agreement and of filing of the determination of the board as to domicile shall be charged.

Laws 1976, LB 584, § 7.